District of Columbia statutes.
29-919

Officers.

The officers of an association shall include a president, one or more vice-presidents, a secretary and a treasurer, or a secretary-treasurer. The officers shall be elected annually by the directors unless the bylaws otherwise provide. The president and at least one vice-president shall be directors, but no other officer need be a director.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(11), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “shall include” for “include.”
1973 Ed., § 29-819.
1981 Ed., § 29-1119.
2001 Ed., § 29-919.